Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1525
Accumulation of junk; failure to remove; violation; penalty.

Any property owner or person in lawful possession of property who fails or refuses to remove an accumulation of junk as directed by the director pursuant to section 81-1524 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1971, LB 939, § 25;

Laws 1972, LB 1435, § 13;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 305;

Laws 2007, LB8, § 1.